Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.590

Validity of indemnification or advance for expenses.

(1) A provision treating a corporation's indemnification of or advance for expenses to directors that is contained in its articles of incorporation, bylaws, a resolution of its shareholders or board of directors, or in a contract or otherwise, is valid only if and to the extent the provision is consistent with RCW 23B.08.500 through 23B.08.580. If articles of incorporation limit indemnification or advance for expenses, indemnification and advance for expenses are valid only to the extent consistent with the articles of incorporation.

(2) RCW 23B.08.500 through 23B.08.580 do not limit a corporation's power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director in connection with the director's appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when the director has not been made a named defendant or respondent to the proceeding.

[ 1989 c 165 s 114.]